District of Columbia statutes.
4-261.01

Definitions.

For the purpose of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Categorical eligibility” means the automatic eligibility for the food stamps program as determined by the enrollment in a separate TANF funded program.

(2)

“Food stamp program” means the federally funded Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.

(3)

“LIHEAP” means the Low Income Home Energy Assistance program.

(4)

“Maximum standard utility allowance” means the maximum level of accepted utility-based income deductions used in determining benefits under the food stamp program.

(5)

“TANF” means the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5081, 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5081 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5081 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Short title: Section 5080 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle I of title V of the act may be cited as the “Food Stamp Expansion Act of 2009”.